test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-pimisin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - pimisin : 

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nipimisinin   # I lie, I lie down, I lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg+Var/East: nipimisin   # I lie, I lie down, I lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kipimisinin   # you lie, you lie down, you lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg+Var/East: kipimisin   # you lie, you lie down, you lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: pimisin   # he/she lies, he/she lies down, he/she lies extended

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-pimisiniyân   # as I lie, as I lie down, as I lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg+Var/East: î-pimisinân   # as I lie, as I lie down, as I lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-pimisiniyan, î-pimisiniyin]   # as you lie, as you lie down, as you lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg+Var/East: î-pimisinan   # as I lie, as I lie down, as I lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-pimisihk   # as he/she lies, as he/she lies down, as he/she lies extended

      # Imp
      pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: pimisini   # (you) lie now, (you) lie down now, (you) lie extended now
      

      # Prs # Ind
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nipimisinin   # I lie, I lie down, I lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg+Var/East: nipimisin   # I lie, I lie down, I lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kipimisinin   # you lie, you lie down, you lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg+Var/East: kipimisin   # you lie, you lie down, you lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: pimisin   # he/she lies, he/she lies down, he/she lies extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nipimisininân   # we lie, we lie down, we lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kipimisinânaw, kipimisinaw]   # we and you lie, we and you lie down, we and you lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kipimisinâwâw   # you all lie, you all lie down, you all lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: pimisinwak   # they lie, they lie down, they lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: pimisinithiwa   # another/others lie, another/others lie down, another/others lie extended
      pimisin+V+AI+Ind+X: [pimisininâniwiw, pimisininâniwan]   # someone lies, someone lies down, someone lies extended
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-pimisiniyân   # as I lie, as I lie down, as I lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg+Var/East: î-pimisinân   # as I lie, as I lie down, as I lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-pimisiniyan, î-pimisiniyin]   # as you lie, as you lie down, as you lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg+Var/East: î-pimisinan   # as I lie, as I lie down, as I lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-pimisihk   # as he/she lies, as he/she lies down, as he/she lies extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-pimisiniyâhk   # as we lie, as we lie down, as we lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl+Var/East: î-pimisinâhk   # as we lie, as we lie down, as we lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-pimisiniyahk   # as we and you lie, as we and you lie down, as we and you lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl+Var/East: î-pimisinahk   # as we and you lie, as we and you lie down, as we and you lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-pimisiniyîk   # as you all lie, as you all lie down, as you all lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl+Var/East: î-pimisinîk   # as you all lie, as you all lie down, as you all lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: î-pimisihkwâw   # as they lie, as they lie down, as they lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-pimisinithit   # as another/others lie, as another/others lie down, as another/others lie extended
      PV/î+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-pimisininâniwik, î-pimisininâniwahk, î-pimisinihk]   # as someone lies, as someone lies down, as someone lies extended
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nikî-pimisinin   # I lay, I lay down, I lay extended
      PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg+Var/East: nikî-pimisin   # I lay, I lay down, I lay extended
      PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kikî-pimisinin   # you lay, you lay down, you lay extended
      PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg+Var/East: kikî-pimisin   # you lay, you lay down, you lay extended
      PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: kî-pimisin   # he/she lay, he/she lay down, he/she lay extended
      PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nikî-pimisininân   # we lay, we lay down, we lay extended
      PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kikî-pimisinânaw, kikî-pimisinaw]   # we and you lay, we and you lay down, we and you lay extended
      PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kikî-pimisinâwâw   # you all lay, you all lay down, you all lay extended
      PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: kî-pimisinwak   # they lay, they lay down, they lay extended
      PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-pimisinithiwa   # another/others lay, another/others lay down, another/others lay extended
      PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+X: [kî-pimisininâniwiw, kî-pimisininâniwan]   # someone lay, someone lay down, someone lay extended
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-kî-pimisiniyân   # as I lay, as I lay down, as I lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg+Var/East: î-kî-pimisinân   # as I lay, as I lay down, as I lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-kî-pimisiniyan, î-kî-pimisiniyin]   # as you lay, as you lay down, as you lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg+Var/East: î-kî-pimisinan   # as I lay, as I lay down, as I lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-pimisihk   # as he/she lay, as he/she lay down, as he/she lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-kî-pimisiniyâhk   # as we lay, as we lay down, as we lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl+Var/East: î-kî-pimisinâhk   # as we lay, as we lay down, as we lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-kî-pimisiniyahk   # as we and you lay, as we and you lay down, as we and you lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl+Var/East: î-kî-pimisinahk   # as we and you lay, as we and you lay down, as we and you lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-kî-pimisiniyîk   # as you all lay, as you all lay down, as you all lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl+Var/East: î-kî-pimisinîk   # as you all lay, as you all lay down, as you all lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: î-kî-pimisihkwâw   # as they lay, as they lay down, as they lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-kî-pimisinithit   # as another/others lay, as another/others lay down, as another/others lay extended
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-kî-pimisininâniwik, î-kî-pimisininâniwahk, î-kî-pimisinihk]   # as someone lay, as someone lay down, as someone lay extended
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: niwî-pimisinin   # I am going to lie, I am going to lie down, I am going to lie extended
      PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg+Var/East: niwî-pimisin   # I am going to lie, I am going to lie down, I am going to lie extended
      PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kiwî-pimisinin   # you are going to lie, you are going to lie down, you are going to lie extended
      PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg+Var/East: kiwî-pimisin   # you are going to lie, you are going to lie down, you are going to lie extended
      PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wî-pimisin   # he/she is going to lie, he/she is going to lie down, he/she is going to lie extended
      PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: niwî-pimisininân   # we are going to lie, we are going to lie down, we are going to lie extended
      PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kiwî-pimisinânaw, kiwî-pimisinaw]   # we and you are going to lie, we and you are going to lie down, we and you are going to lie extended
      PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kiwî-pimisinâwâw   # you all are going to lie, you all are going to lie down, you all are going to lie extended
      PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: wî-pimisinwak   # they are going to lie, they are going to lie down, they are going to lie extended
      PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-pimisinithiwa   # another/others are going to lie, another/others are going to lie down, another/others are going to lie extended
      PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+X: [wî-pimisininâniwiw, wî-pimisininâniwan]   # someone is going to lie, someone is going to lie down, someone is going to lie extended
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-wî-pimisiniyân   # as I am going to lie, as I am going to lie down, as I am going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg+Var/East: î-wî-pimisinân   # as I am going to lie, as I am going to lie down, as I am going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-wî-pimisiniyan, î-wî-pimisiniyin]   # as you are going to lie, as you are going to lie down, as you are going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg+Var/East: î-wî-pimisinan   # as I am going to lie, as I am going to lie down, as I am going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-pimisihk   # as he/she is going to lie, as he/she is going to lie down, as he/she is going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-wî-pimisiniyâhk   # as we are going to lie, as we are going to lie down, as we are going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl+Var/East: î-wî-pimisinâhk   # as we are going to lie, as we are going to lie down, as we are going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-wî-pimisiniyahk   # as we and you are going to lie, as we and you are going to lie down, as we and you are going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl+Var/East: î-wî-pimisinahk   # as we and you are going to lie, as we and you are going to lie down, as we and you are going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-wî-pimisiniyîk   # as you all are going to lie, as you all are going to lie down, as you all are going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl+Var/East: î-wî-pimisinîk   # as you all are going to lie, as you all are going to lie down, as you all are going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: î-wî-pimisihkwâw   # as they are going to lie, as they are going to lie down, as they are going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-wî-pimisinithit   # as another/others are going to lie, as another/others are going to lie down, as another/others are going to lie extended
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-wî-pimisininâniwik, î-wî-pimisininâniwahk, î-wî-pimisinihk]   # as someone is going to lie, as someone is going to lie down, as someone is going to lie extended
      
